California statutes. Probate Code
(c) Unless a settlor or a testator clearly indicates that a broader power is intended by express reference to this subdivision, a person who is a beneficiary of a trust that permits the person, as trustee or cotrustee, to make discretionary distributions of income or principal to or for the benefit of himself or herself may exercise that power in his or her favor only for his or her health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Sections 2041 and 2514 of the Internal Revenue Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing and the provisions of Section 15620, if a power to make discretionary distributions of income or principal is conferred upon two or more trustees, the power may be exercised by any trustee who is not a current permissible beneficiary of that power ; and provided further that if there is no trustee who is not a current permissible beneficiary of that power, any party in interest may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to appoint a trustee who is not a current permissible beneficiary of that power, and the power may be exercised by the trustee appointed by the court.

(d) Subdivision (c) does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any power held by the settlor of a revocable or amendable trust.

(2) Any power held by a settlor’s spouse or a testator’s spouse who is the trustee of a trust for which a marital deduction, as defined in Section 21520, has been allowed.

(e) Subdivision (c) applies to any of the following:

(1) Any trust executed on or after January 1, 1997.

(2) Any testamentary trust created under a will executed on or after January 1, 1997.

(3) Any irrevocable trust created under a document executed before January 1, 1997, or any revocable trust executed before that date if the settlor was incapacitated as of that date, unless all parties in interest elect affirmatively not to be subject to the application of subdivision (c) through a written instrument delivered to the trustee. That election shall be made on or before the latest of January 1, 1998, three years after the date on which the trust became irrevocable, or, in the case of a revocable trust where the settlor was incapacitated, three years after the date on which the settlor became incapacitated.

(f) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the provisions of subdivision (c) neither create a new cause of action nor impair an existing cause of action that, in either case, relates to any power limited by subdivision (c) that was exercised before January 1, 1997.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term “party in interest” means any of the following persons:

(1) If the trust is revocable and the settlor is incapacitated, the settlor’s legal representative under applicable law, or the settlor’s attorney-in-fact under a durable power of attorney that is sufficient to grant the authority required under subdivision (c) or (e), as applicable.

(2) If the trust is irrevocable, each trustee, each beneficiary then entitled or authorized to receive income distributions from the trust, or each remainder beneficiary who would be entitled to receive notice of a trust proceeding under Section 15804. Any beneficiary who lacks legal capacity may be represented by the beneficiary’s legal representative, attorney-in-fact under a durable power of attorney that is sufficient to grant the authority required under subdivision (c) or (e), as applicable, or in the absence of a legal representative or attorney-in-fact, a guardian ad litem appointed for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16082.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in the trust instrument, a person who holds a power to appoint or distribute income or principal to or for the benefit of others, either as an individual or as trustee, may not use the power to discharge the legal obligations of the person holding the power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Duties of Trustees of Private Foundations, Charitable Trusts, and Split-Interest Trusts [16100. - 16105.]

16100.

As used in this article, the following definitions shall control:

(a) “Charitable trust” means a charitable trust as described in Section 4947(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) “Private foundation” means a private foundation as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) “Split-interest trust” means a split-interest trust as described in Section 4947(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16101.

During any period when a trust is deemed to be a charitable trust or a private foundation, the trustee shall distribute its income for each taxable year (and principal if necessary) at a time and in a manner that will not subject the property of the trust to tax under Section 4942 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16102.

During any period when a trust is deemed to be a charitable trust, a private foundation, or a split-interest trust, the trustee shall not do any of the following:

(a) Engage in any act of self-dealing as defined in Section 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Retain any excess business holdings as defined in Section 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Make any investments in such manner as to subject the property of the trust to tax under Section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) Make any taxable expenditure as defined in Section 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16103.

With respect to split-interest trusts:

(a) Subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 16102 do not apply to any trust described in Section 4947(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Section 16102 does not apply with respect to any of the following:

(1) Any amounts payable under the terms of such trust to income beneficiaries, unless a deduction was allowed under Section 170(f)(2)(B), 2055(e)(2)(B), or 2522(c)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Any amounts in trust other than amounts for which a deduction was allowed under Section 170, 545(b)(2), 556(b)(2), 642(c), 2055, 2106(a)(2), or 2522 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the amounts are segregated, as that term is defined in Section 4947(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, from amounts for which no deduction was allowable.

(3) Any amounts irrevocably transferred in trust before May 27, 1969.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16104.

The provisions of Sections 16101, 16102, and 16103 shall be deemed to be contained in the instrument creating every trust to which this article applies. Any provision of the instrument inconsistent with or contrary to this article is without effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16105.

(a) A proceeding contemplated by Section 101(l)(3) of the federal Tax Reform Act of 1969 (Public Law 91-172) may be commenced pursuant to Section 17200 by the organization involved. All specifically named beneficiaries of the organization and the Attorney General shall be parties to the proceedings. Notwithstanding Section 17000, this provision is not exclusive and does not limit any jurisdiction that otherwise exists.

(b) If an instrument creating a trust affected by this section has been recorded, a notice of pendency of judicial proceedings under this section shall be recorded in a similar manner within 10 days from the commencement of the proceedings. A duly certified copy of any final judgment or decree in the proceedings shall be similarly recorded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Notice to the Attorney General of Disposal of Charitable Assets [16110. - 16110.]

16110.

(a) On and after January 1, 2025, or upon the regulations provided for in subdivision (b) taking effect, whichever occurs first, a trustee holding assets subject to a charitable trust shall give written notice to the Attorney General at least 20 days before the trustee sells, leases, conveys, exchanges, transfers, or otherwise disposes of all or substantially all of the charitable assets.

(b) On or after January 1, 2022, the Attorney General shall establish rules and regulations necessary to administer this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16106 by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 60.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Powers of Trustees [16200. - 16249.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [16200. - 16203.]

16200.

A trustee has the following powers without the need to obtain court authorization:

(a) The powers conferred by the trust instrument.

(b) Except as limited in the trust instrument, the powers conferred by statute.

(c) Except as limited in the trust instrument, the power to perform any act that a trustee would perform for the purposes of the trust under the standard of care provided in Section 16040 or 16047.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16201.

This chapter does not affect the power of a court to relieve a trustee from restrictions on the exercise of powers under the trust instrument.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16202.

The grant of a power to a trustee, whether by the trust instrument, by statute, or by the court, does not in itself require or permit the exercise of the power. The exercise of a power by a trustee is subject to the trustee’s fiduciary duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16203.

An instrument that incorporates the powers provided in former Section 1120.2 (repealed by Chapter 820 of the Statutes of 1986) shall be deemed to refer to the powers provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 16220). For this purpose, the trustee’s powers under former Section 1120.2 are not diminished and the trustee is not required to obtain court approval for exercise of a power for which court approval was not required by former law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Specific Powers of Trustees [16220. - 16249.]

16220.

The trustee has the power to collect, hold, and retain trust property received from a settlor or any other person until, in the judgment of the trustee, disposition of the property should be made. The property may be retained even though it includes property in which the trustee is personally interested.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16221.

The trustee has the power to accept additions to the property of the trust from a settlor or any other person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16222.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the trustee has the power to continue or participate in the operation of any business or other enterprise that is part of the trust property and may effect incorporation, dissolution, or other change in the form of the organization of the business or enterprise.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the trustee may continue the operation of a business or other enterprise only as authorized by the trust instrument or by the court. For the purpose of this subdivision, the lease of four or fewer residential units is not considered to be the operation of a business or other enterprise.

(c) The trustee may continue the operation of a business or other enterprise for a reasonable time pending a court hearing on the matter or pending a sale of the business or other enterprise.

(d) The limitation provided in subdivision (b) does not affect any power to continue or participate in the operation of a business or other enterprise that the trustee has under a trust created by an instrument executed before July 1, 1987.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16224.

(a) In the absence of an express provision to the contrary in a trust instrument, where the instrument directs or permits investment in obligations of the United States government, the trustee has the power to invest in those obligations directly or in the form of an interest in a money market mutual fund registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.) or an investment vehicle authorized for the collective investment of trust funds pursuant to Section 9.18 of Part 9 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the portfolios of which are limited to United States government obligations maturing not later than five years from the date of investment or reinvestment and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by United States government obligations.

(b) This section applies only to trusts created on or after January 1, 1985.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16225.

(a) The trustee has the power to deposit trust funds at reasonable interest in any of the following accounts:

(1) An insured account in a financial institution.

(2) To the extent that the account is collateralized, an account in a bank, an account in an insured savings and loan association, or an account in an insured credit union.

(b) A trustee may deposit trust funds pursuant to subdivision (a) in a financial institution operated by, or that is an affiliate of, the trustee. For the purpose of this subdivision, “affiliate” means a corporation that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another domestic or foreign corporation.

(c) This section does not limit the power of a trustee in a proper case to deposit trust funds in an account described in subdivision (a) that is subject to notice or other conditions respecting withdrawal prescribed by law or governmental regulation.

(d) The court may authorize the deposit of trust funds in an account described in subdivision (a) in an amount greater than the maximum insured or collateralized amount.

(e) Nothing in this section prevents the trustee from holding an amount of trust property reasonably necessary for the orderly administration of the trust in the form of cash or in a checking account without interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16226.

The trustee has the power to acquire or dispose of property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale, or by exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16227.

The trustee has the power to manage, control, divide, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon trust property or any interest therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16228.

The trustee has the power to encumber, mortgage, or pledge trust property for a term within or extending beyond the term of the trust in connection with the exercise of any power vested in the trustee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16229.

The trustee has the power to do any of the following:

(a) Make ordinary or extraordinary repairs, alterations, or improvements in buildings or other trust property.

(b) Demolish any improvements.

(c) Raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16230.

The trustee has the power to do any of the following:

(a) Subdivide or develop land.

(b) Dedicate land to public use.

(c) Make or obtain the vacation of plats and adjust boundaries.

(d) Adjust differences in valuation on exchange or partition by giving or receiving consideration.

(e) Dedicate easements to public use without consideration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16231.

The trustee has the power to enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee with or without the option to purchase or renew and for a term within or extending beyond the term of the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16232.

The trustee has the power to enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of gas, oil, or other minerals or geothermal energy, and to enter into a community oil lease or a pooling or unitization agreement, and for a term within or extending beyond the term of the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16233.

The trustee has the power to grant an option involving disposition of trust property or to take an option for the acquisition of any property, and an option may be granted or taken that is exercisable beyond the term of the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16234.

With respect to any shares of stock of a domestic or foreign corporation, any membership in a nonprofit corporation, or any other property, a trustee has the power to do any of the following:

(a) Vote in person, and give proxies to exercise, any voting rights with respect to the shares, memberships, or property.

(b) Waive notice of a meeting or give consent to the holding of a meeting.

(c) Authorize, ratify, approve, or confirm any action that could be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16235.

The trustee has the power to pay calls, assessments, and any other sums chargeable or accruing against or on account of securities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16236.

The trustee has the power to sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16237.

The trustee has the power to consent, directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise, and to participate in voting trusts, pooling arrangements, and foreclosures, and in connection therewith, to deposit securities with and transfer title and delegate discretion to any protective or other committee as the trustee may deem advisable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16238.

The trustee has the power to hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the trust so that title to the security may pass by delivery.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16239.

The trustee has the power to deposit securities in a securities depository, as defined in Section 30004 of the Financial Code, which is licensed under Section 30200 of the Financial Code or is exempt from licensing by Section 30005 or 30006 of the Financial Code. The securities may be held by the securities depository in the manner authorized by Section 775 of the Financial Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16240.

The trustee has the power to insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and to insure the trustee against liability with respect to third persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16241.

The trustee has the power to borrow money for any trust purpose to be repaid from trust property. The lender may include, but is not limited to, a bank holding company, affiliate, or subsidiary of the trustee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16242.

The trustee has the power to do any of the following:

(a) Pay or contest any claim.

(b) Settle a claim by or against the trust by compromise, arbitration, or otherwise.

(c) Release, in whole or in part, any claim belonging to the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16243.

The trustee has the power to pay taxes, assessments, reasonable compensation of the trustee and of employees and agents of the trust, and other expenses incurred in the collection, care, administration, and protection of the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16244.

The trustee has the following powers:

(a) To make loans out of trust property to the beneficiary on terms and conditions that the trustee determines are fair and reasonable under the circumstances.

(b) To guarantee loans to the beneficiary by encumbrances on trust property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16245.

The trustee has the power to pay any sum of principal or income distributable to a beneficiary, without regard to whether the beneficiary is under a legal disability, by paying the sum to the beneficiary or by paying the sum to another person for the use or benefit of the beneficiary. Any sum distributable under this section to a custodian under the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (Part 9 (commencing with Section 3900)) shall be subject to Section 3906.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16246.

The trustee has the power to effect distribution of property and money in divided or undivided interests and to adjust resulting differences in valuation. A distribution in kind may be made pro rata or non pro rata, and may be made pursuant to any written agreement providing for a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the community property assets or quasi-community property assets, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 682, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16247.

The trustee has the power to hire persons, including accountants, attorneys, auditors, investment advisers, appraisers (including probate referees appointed pursuant to Section 400), or other agents, even if they are associated or affiliated with the trustee, to advise or assist the trustee in the performance of administrative duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 806, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

16248.

The trustee has the power to execute and deliver all instruments which are needed to accomplish or facilitate the exercise of the powers vested in the trustee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16249.

The trustee has the power to prosecute or defend actions, claims, or proceedings for the protection of trust property and of the trustee in the performance of the trustee’s duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 49, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act [16320. - 16383.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [16320. - 16323.]

16320.

This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16321.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Accounting period” means a calendar year, unless a fiduciary selects another period of 12 calendar months or approximately 12 calendar months. The term includes a part of a calendar year or another period of 12 calendar months or approximately 12 calendar months that begins when an income interest begins or ends when an income interest ends.

(b) “Asset-backed security” means a security that is serviced primarily by the money flows of a discrete pool of fixed or revolving receivables or other financial assets that by their terms convert into money within a finite time. The term includes rights or other assets that ensure the servicing
 or timely distribution of proceeds to the holder of the asset-backed security. The term does not include an asset to which Section 16340, 16348, or 16353 applies.

(c) “Beneficiary” includes the following:

(1) For a trust:

(A) A current beneficiary, including a current income beneficiary and a beneficiary that may receive only principal.

(B) A remainder beneficiary.

(C) Any other successor beneficiary.

(2) For an estate, an heir, legatee, and devisee.

(3) For a life estate or term interest, a person that holds a life estate, term interest, or remainder or other
 interest following a life estate or term interest.

(d) “Court” means the court in this state having jurisdiction relating to a trust, estate, or life estate or other term interest described in subdivision (b) of Section 16322.

(e) “Current income beneficiary” means a beneficiary to which a fiduciary may distribute net income, whether or not the fiduciary also may distribute principal to the beneficiary.

(f) “Distribution” means a payment or transfer by a fiduciary to a beneficiary in the beneficiary’s capacity as a beneficiary, made under the terms of the trust, without consideration other than the beneficiary’s right to receive the payment or transfer under the terms of the trust. “Distribute,” “distributed,” and “distributee” have corresponding meanings.

(g) “Estate” means a decedent’s estate, and includes the property of the decedent as the estate is originally constituted and the property of the estate as it exists at any time during administration.

(h) “Fiduciary” includes a trustee, personal representative, life tenant, holder of a term interest, and person acting under a delegation from a fiduciary. “Fiduciary” includes a person that holds property for a successor beneficiary whose interest may be affected by an allocation of receipts and expenditures between income and principal. If there are two or more cofiduciaries, the term includes all cofiduciaries acting under the terms of the trust and applicable law.

(i) “Income” means money or other property a fiduciary receives as current return from principal. The term includes a part of receipts from a sale, exchange, or liquidation of a principal asset, to the
 extent provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 16340).

(j) “Income interest” means the right of a current income beneficiary to receive all or part of net income, whether the terms of the trust require the net income to be distributed or authorize the net income to be distributed in the fiduciary’s discretion. The term includes the right of a current beneficiary to use property held by a fiduciary.

(k) “Independent person” means a person that is not:

(1) For a trust, any of the following:

(A) A beneficiary that is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal or would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if either the trust or the interests of the distributees or permissible distributees
 of trust income or principal were terminated, assuming no power of appointment is exercised.

(B) A settlor of the trust.

(C) An individual whose legal obligation to support a beneficiary may be satisfied by a distribution from the trust.

(2) For an estate, a beneficiary.

(3) A spouse, parent, brother, sister, or issue of an individual described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(4) A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity in which persons described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, in the aggregate, have voting control.

(5) An employee of a person described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

(l) “Mandatory income interest” means the right of a current income beneficiary to receive net income that the terms of the trust require the fiduciary to distribute.

(m) “Net income” means the total allocations during an accounting period to income under the terms of a trust and this chapter minus the disbursements during the period, other than distributions, allocated to income under the terms of the trust and this chapter. To the extent the trust is a unitrust under Article 3 (commencing with Section 16330), the term means the unitrust amount determined under that article. The term includes an adjustment from principal to income under Section 16327. The term does not include an adjustment from income to principal under Section 16327.

(n) “Person” means an individual, estate, trust, business or nonprofit
 entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(o) “Personal representative” means an executor, administrator, successor personal representative, special administrator, or person that performs substantially the same function with respect to an estate under the law governing the person’s status.

(p) “Principal” means property held in trust for distribution to, production of income for, or use by a current or successor beneficiary.

(q) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(r) “Settlor” means a person, including a testator, that creates or contributes property to a
 trust. If more than one person creates or contributes property to a trust, the term includes each person, to the extent of the trust property attributable to that person’s contribution, except to the extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that portion.

(s) “Special tax benefit” means any of the following:

(1) Exclusion of a transfer to a trust from gifts described in Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2503(b), as amended) because of the qualification of an income interest in the trust as a present interest in property.

(2) Status as a qualified subchapter S-trust described in Section 1361(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 1361(d)(3), as amended), at a time the trust holds stock of an S-corporation described in
 Section 1361(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 1361(a)(1), as amended).

(3) An estate or gift tax marital deduction for a transfer to a trust under Section 2056 or 2523 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2056 or 2523, as amended), which depends or depended, in whole or in part, on the right of the settlor’s spouse to receive the net income of the trust.

(4) Exemption in whole or in part of a trust from the federal generation-skipping transfer tax imposed by Section 2601 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2601, as amended) because the trust was irrevocable on September 25, 1985, if there is a possibility of any of the following:

(A) A taxable distribution, as defined in Section 2612(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
 as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2612(b), as amended), could be made from the trust.

(B) A taxable termination, as defined in Section 2612(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2612(a), as amended), could occur with respect to the trust.

(C) An inclusion ratio, as defined in Section 2642(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2642(a), as amended), of the trust that is less than one, if there is any possibility of any of the following:

(i) A taxable distribution, as defined in Section 2612(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2612(b), as amended), could be made from the trust.

(ii) A taxable termination, as defined in Section 2612(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
 as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2612(a), as amended), could occur with respect to the trust.

(t) “Successive interest” means the interest of a successor beneficiary.

(u) “Successor beneficiary” means a person entitled to receive income or principal or to use property when an income interest or other current interest ends.

(v) “Terms of a trust” means any of the following:

(1) (A) For a trust, the written trust instrument of an irrevocable trust or those provisions of a written trust instrument in effect at the settlor’s death that describe or affect that portion of a trust that has become irrevocable at the death of the settlor.

(B) “Terms of a trust” includes, but is not
 limited to, signatures, amendments, disclaimers, and any directions or instructions to the trustee that affect the disposition of the trust.

(C) “Terms of a trust” does not include documents that were intended to affect disposition only while the trust was revocable. If a trust has been completely restated, “terms of a trust” does not include trust instruments or amendments that are superseded by the last restatement before the settlor’s death, but it does include amendments executed after the restatement. “Terms of a trust” also includes any document irrevocably exercising a power of appointment over the trust or over any portion of the trust that has become irrevocable.

(2) For an estate, a will.

(3) For a life estate or term interest, the corresponding manifestation of the rights of the beneficiaries.

(w) (1) “Trust” includes both of the following:

(A) An express trust, private or charitable, with additions to the trust, wherever and however created.

(B) A trust created or determined by judgment or decree under which the trust is to be administered in the manner of an express trust.

(2) “Trust” does not include any of the following:

(A) A constructive trust.

(B) A resulting trust, conservatorship, guardianship, multiparty account, custodial arrangement for a minor, business trust, voting trust, security arrangement, liquidation trust, or trust for the primary purpose of paying debts, dividends, interest,
 salaries, wages, profits, pensions, retirement benefits, or employee benefits of any kind.

(C) An arrangement under which a person is a nominee, escrowee, or agent for another.

(x) “Trustee” means a person, other than a personal representative, that owns or holds property for the benefit of a beneficiary. The term includes an original, additional, or successor trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court.

(y) “Will” means a testamentary instrument recognized by applicable law that makes a legally effective disposition of an individual’s property, effective at the individual’s death. “Will” includes a codicil or other amendment to a testamentary instrument.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16322.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this chapter, this chapter applies to the following:

(a) A trust or an estate.

(b) A life estate or other term interest in which the interest of one or more persons will be succeeded by the interest of one or more other persons.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16323.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this chapter, this chapter applies when this state is the principal place of administration of a trust or estate or the situs of property that is not held in a trust or estate and is subject to a life estate or other term interest described in subdivision (b) of Section 16322. By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state or by moving the principal place of administration of a trust to this state, the trustee submits to the application of this chapter to any matter within the scope of this chapter involving the trust.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Fiduciary Duties and Judicial Review [16325. - 16327.]

16325.

(a) In making an allocation or determination or exercising discretion under this chapter, all of the following apply:

(1) A fiduciary shall act in good faith, based on what is fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries.

(2) A fiduciary shall administer a trust or decedent’s estate in accordance with the trust or the will, even if there is a different provision in this chapter.

(3) A fiduciary may administer a trust or decedent’s estate by the exercise of a discretionary power of administration given to the fiduciary by the trust or the will, even if the exercise of the power produces a result different from a result
 required or permitted by this chapter, and no inference that the fiduciary has improperly exercised the discretion arises from the fact that the fiduciary has made an allocation contrary to a provision of this chapter.

(4) A fiduciary shall administer a trust or decedent’s estate in accordance with this chapter if the trust or the will does not contain a different provision or does not give the fiduciary a discretionary power of administration.

(b) A fiduciary’s allocation, determination, or exercise of discretion under this chapter is presumed to be fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries. A fiduciary may exercise a discretionary power of administration given to the fiduciary by the terms of the trust, and an exercise of the power that produces a result different from a result required or permitted by this chapter does not create an inference that the fiduciary abused the
 fiduciary’s discretion.

(c) A fiduciary shall do both of the following:

(1) Add a receipt to principal, to the extent neither the terms of the trust nor this chapter allocates the receipt between income and principal.

(2) Charge a disbursement to principal, to the extent neither the terms of the trust nor this chapter allocates the disbursement between income and principal.

(d) A fiduciary may exercise the power to adjust under Section 16327, convert an income trust to a unitrust under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332, change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332, or convert a unitrust to an income trust under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section
 16332, if the fiduciary determines the exercise of the power will assist the fiduciary to administer the trust or estate impartially.

(e) Factors the fiduciary shall consider in making the determination under subdivision (d) include all of the following:

(1) The terms of the trust.

(2) The nature, distribution standards, and expected duration of the trust.

(3) The effect of the allocation rules, including specific adjustments between income and principal, under Article 4 (commencing with Section 16340) to Article 7 (commencing with Section 16375), inclusive.

(4) The desirability of liquidity and regularity of income.

(5) The
 desirability of the preservation and appreciation of principal.

(6) The extent to which an asset is used or may be used by a beneficiary.

(7) The increase or decrease in the value of principal assets, reasonably determined by the fiduciary.

(8) Whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the fiduciary power to accumulate income or invade principal or prohibit the fiduciary from accumulating income or invading principal.

(9) The extent to which the fiduciary has accumulated income or invaded principal in preceding accounting periods.
